Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-759
Sickness and accident insurance on a franchise plan, defined.

Sickness and accident insurance on a franchise plan is hereby declared to be that form of sickness and accident insurance issued to (1) five or more employees of any corporation, partnership, limited liability company, individual employer, or governmental corporation or agency or department thereof or (2) ten or more members of any trade or professional association or of a labor union or of any other association having had an active existence for at least two years where such association or union has a constitution or bylaws and is formed in good faith for purposes other than that of obtaining insurance, if such persons, with or without their dependents, are issued the same form of an individual policy varying only as to amounts and kinds of coverage applied for by such persons.

Laws 1947, c. 164, § 15, p. 468;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 226.